Washington statutes.
RCW 35.76.030

Cost accounting and reporting—Cities of eight thousand or less.

Consistent with the intent of this chapter as stated in RCW 35.76.010, the state auditor, from and after July 1, 1965, is authorized and directed to prescribe accounting and reporting procedures for street expenditures for cities and towns having a population of eight thousand or less, according to the last official census.

[ 1995 c 301 s 49; 1965 c 7 s 35.76.030. Prior: 1963 c 115 s 3.]